Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.005

Finding—Intent.

The legislature finds that agency missions, goals, and objectives should focus on statewide results. It is the intent of the legislature to focus the biennial budget on how state agencies produce real results that reflect the goals of statutory programs. Specifically, budget managers and the legislature must have the data to move toward better statewide results that produce the intended public benefit. This data must be supplied in an impartial, quantifiable form, and demonstrate progress toward statewide results. With a renewed focus on achieving true results, state agencies, the office of financial management, and the legislature will be able to prioritize state resources.

[ 2005 c 386 s 1.]